Massachusetts, session 194th, S1625.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Massachusetts General Laws Chapter 17 as appearing in the 2022 Edition is hereby
amended by adding the following new section
Section 22: There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a
fund to be known as the United Neighbor's Investing in the Truth for Youth Fund (UNITY
Fund), which shall be administered by the Commissioner of the Department of Public Health.
Expenditures from the fund shall not be subject to appropriation unless otherwise required by
law. The fund shall provide funding for, but not supplant, funds previously designated to support
public health investigations under Section 4 of Chapter 21e of the General Laws. The purpose
of the fund shall be to provide initial and ongoing funding for cancer surveillance and
environmental data collection and to ensure that studies initiated by the department to examine
of 2

the human health impact of past and present environmental conditions are completed in as timely
a manner as scientifically feasible. Funds may be provided from the UNITY Fund to support
environmental public health activities including but not limited to research, environmental and
biologic sample(s) design and collection modeling, surveys, public engagement and associated
administrative costs. The commissioner shall administer the fund using methods, policies,
procedures, standards, and criteria for the proper and efficient operation of the fund and studies
supported by it in a manner designed to achieve equity, fairness, and efficiency. The secretary of
administration and finance, in consultation with the secretary of health and human services, shall
determine annually the expenses of administering the fund, which shall be charged to the fund.
Any health surveillance and research efforts supported by the UNITY Fund shall be published
electronically on the General Court website as well as the department’s website and filed with
the clerks of the House and Senate. The commissioner shall report annually itemized
expenditures from the fund to the clerks of the House and Senate and the Senate and House
committees on ways and means.
(b) The fund shall consist of: (i) legislative appropriations; (ii) gifts or grants from private
or public sources, (iii) any legislatively authorized transfers approved by the secretary of
administration and finance; and (iv) state and/or federal funds received as a result of cost
recovery efforts associated with health investigations related to state and nationally recognized
hazardous waste for the specific purpose of the fund. Any amounts contained in the fund shall
not revert to the general fund. All interest earned on the amounts in the fund shall be deposited or
retained in the fund. The Comptroller shall pay, without further appropriation, any and all
amounts certified by the Commissioner for payment as provided above.
of 2